th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > โรงแรมและการบริการ > อุปกรณ์การบริการ > อุปกรณ์ใต้คาน: จุดตั้งบาร์และค็อกเทล; ชั้นวางแก้ว; ปกเมนูและสมุดเดินบิล; จอและกระดานแสดงเมนู; ที่วางขวดค็อกเทล
sv: Företag och industri > Hotellverksamhet > Förnödenheter för besöksnäring > Utrustning bakom bar: Bar- och cocktailstationer; Glasställ; Menyomslag och räkningspresentatörer; Menyskärmar och brädor; Flaskhyllor
nb: Forretninger og industri > Hotell og reiseliv > Reiselivsutstyr > Underbarutstyr: Bar- og cocktailstasjoner; Glasstativer; Menyomslag og regningshefter; Menyskjermer og -tavler; Speed Rails
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Szálloda és vendéglátás > Vendéglátási kellékek > Rúd alatti berendezések: Bár és koktélállomások; Üvegállványok; Menüborítók és csekkbemutatók; Menükijelzők és -táblák; Sebességkorlátok
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Hotel e hospitalidade > Artigos de restauração > Equipamento de bar: Estações de bar e cocktails; Prateleiras de vidro; Capas para ementa e expositores de conta; Expositores e quadros para ementa; Prateleiras barra para garrafas
it: Commercio e industria > Alberghi e ospitalità > Forniture per l'ospitalità > Attrezzatura sottobarra: Bar e postazioni cocktail; Scaffali per bicchieri; Copertine del menu e porta conto; Display e schede di menu; Binari di velocità
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Хотелиерство и ресторантьорство > Ресторантьорски консумативи > Бар оборудване: Барове и коктейл станции; Стелажи за стъкло; Папки за менюта и сметкодържатели; Дигитални менюта и дъски; Рафтове за бутилки
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Khách sạn & Dịch vụ khách hàng > Đồ dùng dịch vụ khách sạn > Trang thiết bị sau quầy bar: Quầy pha chế; Giá treo ly; Bìa menu & sổ kẹp hóa đơn; Màn hình hiển thị & bảng menu; Khay để chai rượu
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Hotelové a pohostinské služby > Potreby v oblasti pohostinských služieb > Zariadenie pod barom: Barové a koktailové stanice; Sklenené stojany; Obaly jedálneho lístka a dosky na účtenky; Tabule s jedálnym lístkom; Hliníkové poličky
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Hotelarstwo > Wyposażenie hoteli > Wyposażenie barów: Bary i stacje barmańskie; Regały szklane; Okładki menu i etui na rachunek; Gabloty i tablice z menu; Szuflady podręczne
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Hoteluri și sectorul ospitalității > Articole pentru servicii de ospitalitate > Echipament pentru baruri: Baruri și stații de lucru pentru cocteiluri; Rafturi de sticlă; Coperți pentru meniu și portofele pentru nota de plată; Standuri și panouri pentru afișarea meniurilor; Compartimente pentru acces rapid la băuturi
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Hôtel et service d’accueil > Fournitures d’accueil > Équipement sous le bar: Stations de bar et cocktails; Supports à verres; Couvertures de menu et présentoirs de chèques; Affichages et tableaux de menu; Rails rapides
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Hotelli ja majoitus > Majoitustarvikkeet > Baarin alle sijoitettavat laitteet: Baari- ja cocktailasemat; Lasitelineet; Ruokalistasuojukset ja kuittikotelot; Ruokalistanäytöt ja -levyt; Pikakiskot
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Hotel e hospitalidade > Suprimentos para hospitalidade > Equipamento abaixo do balcão: Estações de bar e coquetéis; Prateleiras de vidro; Capas de menu e apresentadores de contas; Exibições e quadros de menu; Trilhos de velocidade
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 飯店與餐飲 > 餐飲用品 > 吧台下方設備: 吧台和雞尾酒調酒站; 玻璃架; 菜單封面和帳單夾; 菜單螢幕和看板; 易取架
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Otel ve Ağırlama > Ağırlama Malzemeleri > Bar Altı Ekipmanları: Bar ve Kokteyl İstasyonları; Cam Raflar; Menü Kapakları ve Hesap Sunucuları; Menü Göstergeleri ve Panoları; Hız Rayları
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ξενοδοχείο & φιλοξενία > Είδη προμηθειών φιλοξενίας > Εξοπλισμός κάτω από τον πάγκο μπαρ: Σταθμοί για μπαρ & κοκτέιλ; Ράφια για ποτήρια; Θήκες μενού & θήκες παρουσίασης λογαριασμού; Επιτοίχιες και επιτραπέζιες πινακίδες μενού; Ράγες ταχείας πρόσβασης για μπαρ
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Hotels & Gaststätten > Gastbranchenbedarf > Unterbar-Equipment: Bar- und Cocktailstationen; Glasregale; Speisekartenumschläge und Scheckhalter; Menü-Schilder und -Tafeln; Speed Rails
es: Economía e industria > Hostelería y hospedaje > Suministros de hostelería > Equipo para la parte inferior de la barra: Estaciones de bar y cócteles; Portacopas; Cubiertas de menú y portacuentas; Pantallas y tableros de menú; Barra de velocidad
en: Business & Industrial > Hotel & Hospitality > Hospitality Supplies > Underbar Equipment: Bar & Cocktail Stations; Glass Racks; Menu Covers & Check Presenters; Menu Displays & Boards; Speed Rails
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Hotelijerstvo i ugostiteljstvo > Ugostiteljske potrepštine > Oprema za ispod šanka: Barovi i koktel stanice; Spremnici za čaše; Korice za jelovnike i račune; Ploče s jelovnicima; Stalci za piće
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Hotel en accommodatie > Accomodatiebenodigdheden > Uitrusting voor onder de bar: Bar- en cocktailstations; Glazen rekken; Menuhoezen en rekeningmapjes; Menudisplays en -borden; Snelheidsrails
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Hotely a ubytovací služby > Vybavení pro pohostinství > Vybavení pro bary: Barové a koktejlové stanice; Police na sklenice; Deskyna menu a účet; Menu displeje a tabule; Rychlé stojany
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Гостинично-ресторанный бизнес > Товары для баров в гостиницах > Оборудование для бара: Барные и коктейльные станции; Держатели для бокалов; Папки для меню и счетов; Меню-борды; Карманы для бутылок
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 호텔/숙박업 > 숙박업 용품 > 바 설비: 바/칵테일 스테이션; 유리 랙; 메뉴 커버/계산서 꽂이; 메뉴 디스플레이/보드; 스피드 레일
da: Erhverv og industri > Hotel og overnatning > Forsyninger til overnatning > Underbar-udstyr: Bar og cocktailstationer; Glasstativer; Menuomslag og regningsmapper; Menudisplays og tavler; Skinner
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Hoteli in gostinstvo > Gostinska oprema > Oprema pod točilnim pultom: Barske postaje in postaje za koktajl bar; Stojala za kozarce; Ovoji za menije in držala za račun; Prikazovalniki in table z jedilniki; Regali za hitro postrežbo
ja: ビジネス・産業 > ホテル・サービス業 > おもてなし用品 > バーカウンターの下の設備: バー・カクテルステーション; ガラスラック; メニューカバー・デンピョウバインダー; メニューディスプレイ・ボード; スピードレール
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Viešbučiai, apgyvendinimo ir maitinimo paslaugų sektorius > Apgyvendinimo ir maitinimo paslaugų reikmenys > Po baru montuojama įranga: Barų ir kokteilių stotys; Stiklo lentynos; Meniu viršeliai ir čekių aplankai; Meniu ekranai ir lentos; Bėgeliai gėrimams
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 酒店与宾馆 > 宾馆用品 > 酒吧设备: 酒吧和鸡尾酒调制台; 玻璃架; 菜单封面和发票/支票/收据夹; 菜单展示架和展板; 快速导轨